Utah statutes.
53-9-116.   Divulging investigative information -- False reports prohibited.

(1)  Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, a licensee may not divulge or release to anyone other than his client or employer the contents of an investigative file acquired in the course of licensed investigative activity.  However, the board shall have access to investigative files if the client for whom the information was acquired, or his lawful representative, alleges a violation of this chapter by the licensee or if the prior written consent of the client to divulge or release the information has been obtained.

(2)  A licensee may not willfully make a false statement or report to a client, employer, the board, or any authorized representative of the department, concerning information acquired in the course of activities regulated by this chapter.

(3)  The licensee shall submit investigative reports to a client at times and in the manner agreed upon between the licensee and the client.

(4)  Upon demand by the client, the licensee shall divulge to the client the results of an investigation if payment in full has been tendered for the charges levied.

(5)  The licensee has full right to withdraw from any case and refund any portion of a retainer for which investigative work has not been completed.

